Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-12] Mitigation. The fund
shall develop a comprehensive loss reduction plan for the hurricane peril. The
plan shall include standards for new residential and commercial structures and
separate standards for existing residential and commercial structures. The
plan shall provide a timetable for implementation of mandatory loss mitigation
measures for both new and existing structures. [L 1993, c 339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next